Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5274.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 17 of the General Laws entitled "ELECTIONS" is hereby amended by
adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 30
RESIDENCE OF INDIVIDUALS IN GOVERNMENT CUSTODY ACT
17-30-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Residence of Individuals in
Government Custody Act."
17-30-2. Legislative purpose, declaration and findings.
The purpose of this chapter is to ensure that persons in government custody within the state
are counted at their actual residence for redistricting purposes. The general assembly notes that §
17-1-3.1 provides: "A person's residence for voting purposes is his or her fixed and established
domicile… A person can have only one domicile, and the domicile shall not be considered lost
solely by reason of absence for any of the following reasons:…Confinement in a correctional
facility…". Investigation has shown that, despite these provisions, the census classifies incarcerated
persons as residents of their places of incarceration rather than of their home addresses. The
provisions of this chapter are necessary to provide procedures and duties to correct this discrepancy.
17-30-3. Electronic record.
The department of corrections shall collect and maintain an electronic record of the legal

residence, presumptively outside of the facility, and other demographic data, for any person
entering its custody after January 1, 2026. At a minimum, this record shall contain the last known
complete street address prior to incarceration, the person's race, whether the person is of Hispanic
or Latino origin, and whether the person is over the age of eighteen (18) years.
17-30-4. Reports to the secretary of state.
(a) By May 1 of each year, the department of corrections shall deliver to the secretary of
state:
(1) The street address of the correctional facility in which such person was incarcerated at
the time of such report;
(2) The last known address of such person prior to incarceration or other legal residence (if
known);
(3) The person's race, whether the person is of Hispanic or Latino origin, and whether the
person is over the age of eighteen (18) years (if known);
(4) For any person who entered the department’s custody prior to January 1, 2026, the
department shall provide all information specified in subsections (a)(1) through (a)(3) of this
section, that exists in its records; and
(5) Any additional information, as the secretary of state may request pursuant to law.
(b) The department shall provide the information specified in subsection (a) of this section,
in such form as the secretary of state shall specify.
(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of the general or public laws to the contrary, the
information required to be provided to the secretary of state pursuant to this section, shall not
include the name of any incarcerated person and shall not allow for the identification of any such
person therefrom, except to the department of corrections. The information shall be treated as
confidential, and shall not be disclosed by the secretary of state, except as redistricting data
aggregated by census block for purposes which they may require.
17-30-5. Federal facilities.
The secretary of state shall request each agency that operates a federal facility in this state
that incarcerates persons convicted of a criminal offense, to provide the secretary of state with a
report including the information listed in § 17-30-4.
17-30-6. Requiring use of data in redistricting.
The secretary of state shall prepare redistricting population data to reflect incarcerated
persons at their residential address, pursuant to § 17-30-4. The data prepared by the secretary of
state pursuant to § 17-30-4, shall be the basis of state house of representative districts, state senate
districts, and all local government districts that are based on population. Incarcerated populations
LC000521 - Page 2 of 5

residing at unknown geographic locations within the state, as determined under § 17-30-4, shall not
be used to determine the ideal population of any set of districts, wards, or precincts.
17-30-7. Redistricting data publication by the secretary of state.
(a) For each person included in a report received under this chapter, the secretary of state
shall determine the geographic units for which population counts are reported in the federal
decennial census, that contain the facility of incarceration and the legal residence as listed according
to the report.
(b) For each person included in a report received under this chapter, if the legal residence
is known and in this state, the secretary of state shall:
(1) Ensure that the person is not represented in any population counts reported by the
secretary of state, for the geographic units that include the facility at which the person was
incarcerated, unless that geographic unit also includes the person's legal residence; and
(2) Ensure that any population counts reported by the secretary of state, reflect the person’s
residential address as reported, pursuant to this chapter.
(c) For each person included in a report received under this chapter for whom a legal
residence is unknown or not in this state, and for all persons reported in the census as residing in a
federal correctional facility for whom a report was not provided, the secretary of state shall:
(1) Ensure that the person is not represented in any population counts reported by the
secretary of state for the geographic units that include the facility at which the person was
incarcerated; and
(2) Allocate the person to a state unit not tied to a specific determined geography, as other
state residents with unknown state addresses are allocated, including, but not limited to, military
and federal government personnel stationed overseas.
(d) The data prepared by the secretary of state pursuant to this section shall be completed
and published no later than thirty (30) days from the date that federal decennial data is published
for the State of Rhode Island or forty-five (45) days after the effective date of this chapter,
whichever is later.
17-30-8. Annual reports by the secretary of state.
For each report received from the department or federal agency under this chapter, the
secretary of state shall analyze the data submitted for its completeness and publish its findings,
including, but not limited to:
(1) The number of records that were missing data;
(2) The number of records that could not be geocoded; and
(3) For any records that could not be geocoded, a determination of which information was
LC000521 - Page 3 of 5

missing or otherwise made the record unable to be geocoded.
17-30-9. Use in aid.
The data prepared by the secretary of state as required by § 17-30-4, shall not be used in
the distribution of any state or federal aid.
17-30-10. Severability.
If any provision of this chapter or the application of any provision of this chapter to any
person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications
of the chapter that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and for this
purpose the provisions of this chapter are severable.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000521
========
LC000521 - Page 4 of 5